Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 821.320 is amended to read:
821.320. The following fees are established relating to snowmobiles:
(1) Registration under ORS 821.080, [ $10] $30.
(2) Renewal of registration under ORS 821.080, [ $10] $30.
(3) Issuance of out-of-state permit under ORS 821.130, $7.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 821.320 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to  fees
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1565 (SB 1565-INTRO) Page 1